Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 14 ADJUDICATION OF WATER RIGHTS
§ 42-1411. Report of the director.

The director shall prepare a director’s report on the water system. The director may file the director’s report in parts as the director deems appropriate. The director may include such explanatory material as he deems appropriate in the director’s report. Such explanatory material shall not impose any conditions or restrictions on the rights reported and shall not be subject to objection. This explanatory material shall not be used to support any notice of claim, objection to a notice of claim, or response to an objection.

The director shall determine the following elements, to the extent the director deems appropriate and proper, to define and administer the water rights acquired under state law:

the name and address of the claimant;

the source of water;

the quantity of water used describing the rate of water diversion or, in the case of an instream flow right, the rate of water flow in cubic feet per second or annual volume of diversion of water for use or storage in acre-feet per year as necessary for the proper administration of the water right;

the date of priority;

the legal description of the point(s) of diversion; if the claim is for an instream flow, then a legal description of the beginning and ending points of the claimed instream flow;

the purpose of use;

the period of the year when water is used for such purposes;

a legal description of the place of use; if one (1) of the purposes of use is irrigation, then the number of irrigated acres within each forty (40) acre subdivision, except that the place of use may be described using a general description in the manner provided under section 42-219, Idaho Code, which may consist of a digital boundary as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, if the irrigation project would qualify to be so described under section 42-219, Idaho Code;

conditions on the exercise of any water right included in any decree, license, or approved transfer application; and

such remarks and other matters as are necessary for definition of the right, for clarification of any element of a right, or for administration of the right by the director.

The director may include such general provisions in the director’s report, as the director deems appropriate and proper, to define and to administer all water rights.

The director shall file the director’s report with the district court, and the director’s report shall be a part of the record. Upon filing with the court, the director’s report, except for the explanatory material referred to in subsection (1) of this section, shall constitute prima facie evidence of the nature and extent of the water rights acquired under state law. The unobjected to portions of the director’s report shall be decreed as reported.

Each claimant of a water right acquired under state law has the ultimate burden of persuasion for each element of a water right. Since the director’s report is prima facie evidence of the nature and extent of the water rights acquired under state law, a claimant of a water right acquired under state law has the burden of going forward with the evidence to establish any element of a water right which is in addition to or inconsistent with the description in a director’s report. Any party filing an objection to any portion of the director’s report shall have the burden of going forward with the evidence to rebut the director’s report as to all issues raised by the objection. Provided however, that a claimant objecting to the director’s recommended place of use described by a digital boundary or other similar technology shall not be required to produce digital boundary or other similar technology-generated evidence in order to meet the burden provided by this section. Places of use described using digital boundaries or other similar technology-based descriptions shall not be entitled to any greater weight than descriptions by metes and bounds, the number of irrigated acres within each forty (40) acre subdivision, or other method adequate for the description of water rights. Any other party to the proceeding may submit evidence in opposition to the objector’s position and in support of the director’s report. All such proceedings shall be governed by the Idaho rules of civil procedure and Idaho rules of evidence.
(6) The director shall file an original of the director’s report with the district court. The director shall also distribute for display and review at least one (1) copy of the director’s report to the office of the clerk of the district court for each county in which any part of the water system is located. The director shall also serve on each claimant or the claimant’s attorney whose water right is listed in the director’s report a notice of filing of the director’s report. Notice shall be sent to the last known address of the claimant or the claimant’s attorney. The notice shall be prepared by the director using plain and concise language and shall include:

a statement that the director’s report of the various water rights acquired under state law has been filed with the district court, naming the district court(s) to which the report was filed;

a copy of that portion of the report setting forth the claimant’s water right;

a statement that a complete copy of the director’s report is available for inspection, listing the locations at which the director’s report is available, which shall include the office of the clerk of the district court for each county in which any part of the water system is located, the offices of the department, and any other locations the director may designate;

a statement that all or a portion of the director’s report is available upon request at the offices of the department, subject to payment of a reasonable fee to cover costs of reproduction and mailing;

a statement that any claimant may file objections to any portion of the director’s report with the district court specified in the notice and must mail a copy of the objection to the director, and to the claimant of each claimed right objected to, if the objector is not also the claimant of the right for which the objection is filed;

the date prior to which all objections must be filed, which shall not be less than sixty (60) days for any director’s report containing five hundred (500) claims or less, one hundred twenty (120) days for any director’s report containing more than five hundred (500) claims and not more than five thousand (5,000) claims, and one hundred eighty (180) days for any director’s report containing more than five thousand (5,000) claims; the above-stated periods of time shall commence on the date of service by mail of the notice of filing;

a statement that claimants may file responses with the court to objections filed against their claims, and that a copy of any response must be mailed to the director and to the objector;

the date prior to which all responses to objections must be filed with the court, which shall not be less than sixty (60) days following receipt of a copy of the objection; and

a statement that any part of the report to which no objections are filed shall be decreed by the district court and the time and location set for the hearing at which the unobjected parts of the report will be decreed, which time shall not be less than sixty (60) days following the expiration of the period for filing objections.
(7) The director shall file an affidavit with the district court demonstrating compliance with the notice requirements of subsection (6) of this section.

§ 42-1411A. Service of notice of and determination of water rights established under federal law.

The district court shall determine the water rights established under federal law in accordance with the procedures established in this section.

The district court shall determine the following procedures for water rights established under federal law:

The contents of a notice of water right claims established under federal law;

The method of service of the notice of water right claims established under federal law;

The location of any depositories of notices of claim for water rights established under federal law, if the district court determines that claim depositories are necessary to provide other claimants reasonable access to the notices of claims established under federal law.

The district court shall be guided by the following three (3) principles in establishing the procedures required in this section:

The purpose of this notice is to provide notice to other claimants of the filing of water rights established under federal law comparable to the notice of filing for water rights acquired under state law;

The procedures shall not impose any burden greater than the burden placed upon the director to prepare, file, and serve the notice of filing for a director’s report; and

The procedure shall comply with the McCarran amendment, 43 USC 666.

Any claimant of a water right established under federal law shall serve all such notices of claim on the other claimants in accordance with the procedures established by the district court.

Any claimant may contract with the director to perform all or any portion of the service required in this section. The director shall require in any contract that the cost of the services provided by the director are reimbursed by the claimant of a water right established under federal law.

The United States, if it filed any notices of claim for a water right established under federal law, and any other claimants of such water rights, shall file an affidavit demonstrating proof of service in compliance with this section.

The district court shall provide at least sixty (60) days for filing objections to water rights established under federal law where the number of those water rights are five hundred (500) or less, at least one hundred twenty (120) days where the number of these water rights are more than five hundred (500) and not more than five thousand (5,000), and at least one hundred eighty (180) days where the number of these water rights are more than five thousand (5,000).

Any claimant who desires to object to a claim established under federal law shall file an objection with the district court within the time specified in the notice of water right claims established under federal law. The claimant shall also send a copy of the objection to the claimant whose claim is the subject of the objection and to the director. Any claimant may file a response to an objection.

The notice of claim, objection, and responses to an objection shall identify the issues to be litigated.

If a claimant of a water right established under federal law has filed notices of claim for one (1) water use based upon state and federal law, the district court shall develop procedures, after an opportunity for hearing, for coordination of the determination of such claims based upon state and federal law.
(11) The district court shall conduct the trial without a jury on an objection or any group of objections in accordance with the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

(12) Each claimant of a water right established under federal law has the ultimate burden of persuasion for each element of a water right. Since no independent review of the notice of claim has occurred as provided for water rights acquired under state law in a director’s report, a claimant of a water right established under federal law has the burden of going forward with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the water right established under federal law. All such proceedings shall be governed by the Idaho rules of civil procedure and Idaho rules of evidence.

(13) The district court shall enter a partial decree that contains or incorporates a statement of each element of a water right as stated in subsection (1) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code, as applicable, and that contains such general provisions, remarks, and other matters as are necessary for definition of the right, for clarification of any element of a right, or for administration of the right by the director.

(14) If no objections are filed to a notice of claim for a water right established under federal law, the claimant shall appear at a hearing scheduled by the district court and shall demonstrate a prima facie case of the existence of the water right established under federal law prior to entry of a decree for such claimed water right established under federal law. If the claimant fails to present a prima facie case of the existence of the water right established under federal law, then the district court shall enter an order determining that the claimed water right does not exist.

(15) Any party may appeal in accordance with the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

(16) The attorney general shall represent the state of Idaho in all matters regarding claims to water rights established under federal law, including, but not limited to, filing objections to water right claims established under federal law.

§ 42-1412. Objections — Responses to objections — Hearing before district judge — Entry of final decree.

Any claimant who desires to object to a water right, or to a general provision in the director’s report, shall file an objection with the district court within the time specified in the notice of filing of the director’s report. The claimant shall also send a copy of the objection to the claimant whose water right claim is the subject of the objection and to the director.

The director may file with the district court a supplemental report to any objection to the director’s report within the time specified in the notice of filing of the report. The director shall file with the district court the original of the notice of claim. The director shall mail a copy of the supplemental report to the objector and the claimant whose right is the subject of the objection. A claimant may file with the district court a response to any objection filed with respect to the claimant’s water right within the time specified in the notice of filing of the report. If a party other than the claimant or the objector desires to participate in the proceeding concerning a particular objection, the party shall file a response to the objection that states the position of the party. In addition, any party may intervene in any objection proceeding in accordance with rules of practice and procedure established by the district court.

The notice of claim, objections, and responses to objections, shall identify the issues to be heard for water rights acquired under state law.

Following expiration of the period for filing objections and responses thereto, the district court shall hear and determine the objections to any water right or to any general provision in the director’s report. The court shall before any trial, however, order a settlement conference to determine whether the matter can be settled. The court may request the director to conduct a further investigation and to submit a supplemental report for any water right acquired under state law that is the subject of an objection. In addition, the district court or a party may request the director or his designee to present the basis for the recommendations in the director’s report.

The district court or special master shall conduct the trial without a jury on an objection or any group of objections in accordance with the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

The district court shall enter a partial decree determining the nature and extent of the water right which is the subject of the objection or other matters which are the subject of the objection. The decree shall contain or incorporate a statement of each element of a water right as stated in subsections (2) and (3) of section 42-1411, Idaho Code, as applicable. The decree shall also contain an express statement that the partial decree is subject to such general provisions necessary for the definition of the rights or for the efficient administration of the water rights. Upon entry of the decree, the clerk of the district court shall send a certified copy of the decree to the director in accordance with section 42-1403, Idaho Code. The clerk of the district court shall notify the objector and claimant of each right as to which an objection was determined by the district court of entry of the decree in the manner provided in the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

Not less than sixty (60) days after the expiration of the period for filing objections, the director shall file with the district court a statement of those portions of the director’s report for which no objection was filed. Following hearing, the district court shall enter a partial decree as to those portions of the director’s report for which no objection has been filed. However, the district court may exclude unobjected claims from this list if the unobjected claim may be affected by the outcome of a contested matter. The decree shall contain or incorporate a statement of those elements of a water right contained in the director’s report for water rights acquired under state law. Upon entry of the decree, the clerk of the district court shall send a certified copy of the decree to the director in accordance with section 42-1403, Idaho Code. The clerk of the district court shall notify each claimant of entry of the decree in the manner provided in the Idaho rules of civil procedure.
(8) Upon resolution of all objections to water rights acquired under state law, to water rights established under federal law, and to general provisions, and after entry of partial decree(s), the district court shall combine all partial decrees and the general provisions into a final decree.

(9) The district court may extend or shorten the time for filing any objection to the director’s report or any response to an objection.

§ 42-1413. Filing of final decree.

When a decree has become final in an adjudication in which the director filed a report, the director shall file a certified copy of the decree or a transcript thereof in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the place of use or point of diversion of the water rights contained in the decree is located.

Upon entry of a final decree, the director shall administer the water rights by distributing water in accordance with the final decree and with title 42, Idaho Code.

When a decree has become final in an adjudication in which the director has not filed a report, the clerk of the district court in which the decree is entered shall file a certified copy of the decree or a transcript thereof in the office of the county recorder for each county in which the place of use or point of diversion of the water rights decreed is located, and shall send a certified copy of the decree to the director as required in section 42-1403, Idaho Code.

The transcript of decree shall contain the following:

title of the district court;

name of the case;

the case number;

names of each party;

date of entry;

the description of the boundaries of the water system, which is the subject of the general adjudication;

a statement that the decree is entered in the records of the clerk of the district court;

a statement that information as to the rights decreed is available at the offices of the department; and

such other information as may be necessary to assist any person searching the title of a parcel to find the decree.

A decree or transcript recorded pursuant to this section from the time it is filed with the recorder for record, is constructive notice of the contents of the decree within the county in which the decree or transcript is recorded to subsequent purchasers and mortgagees.

Notwithstanding the filing of a certified copy of the decree or a transcript thereof in the office of the county recorder, only the legal description of an irrigation district’s boundaries recorded in compliance with title 43, Idaho Code, shall constitute conclusive proof of the district’s boundaries. The decree shall not be construed to define, limit or otherwise affect the apportionment of benefits to lands within an irrigation district pursuant to chapter 7, title 43, Idaho Code. A notice consistent with this subsection shall be filed with the certified copy of the decree or a transcript thereof.

§ 42-1414. Fees for filing notice of claims with the director.

In order to provide an adequate and equitable cost-sharing formula for financing the costs of adjudicating water rights the department of water resources shall accept no notice of claim required under the provisions of section 42-1409, Idaho Code, unless such notice of claim is submitted with a filing fee based upon the fee schedule set forth below. Failure to pay the variable water use fee in accordance with the timetable provided shall be cause for the department to reject and return the notice of claim to the claimant. The fee schedule set forth below applies to adjudication proceedings commenced or enlarged on or after January 1, 1985.

Flat fee per claim filed:

Claims for domestic and/or stock watering rights ............................... $25.00

Claims for all other rights ............................... $50.00

Additional variable water use fee for claims filed based upon acreage, power generating capacity, c.f.s., or equivalent volume of water:

Irrigation use (one fee irrespective of number of
claims): ............................... $1.00 per acre

Power: ............................... $3.50 per kilowatt of capacity (manufacturer’s
nameplate rating), or $250,000, whichever is less

Aquaculture: ............................... $10.00 per c.f.s.

Municipal, industrial, commercial, mining, heating,
cooling: ............................... $100.00 per c.f.s.

Public instream flow, public lake level maintenance,
wildlife: ............................... $100.00 per c.f.s.

All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be placed in the water resources adjudication account [fund] established in section 42-1777, Idaho Code.

If a claimant increases in an amended notice of claim the amount of water claimed, the amount of land irrigated, or the kilowatt capacity of the generating facility, the claimant shall pay upon filing the amended notice of claim an additional variable fee in accordance with the rates set forth in subsection (1) of this section. Claimants shall be entitled to a return of filing fees or late fees only where the fee was miscalculated at the time the original or amended notice of claim was filed.

If a claimant files a notice of claim after the date set by the director in the notice mailed or served in accordance with subsections [subsection] (2), (3), or (4) of section 42-1408, Idaho Code, or with subsection (7) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code, the claimant shall pay the fee set forth in subsection (1) of this section, and in addition, the amount of fifty dollars ($50) or fifteen percent (15%) of the original filing fee, whichever is greater. The director may waive the late processing fee or a portion thereof for good cause.

Provided however, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, fees for stock watering right claims, regardless of the number of claims filed, shall only be imposed on the first four (4) claims per claimant, and there shall be no other fees or costs imposed for such claims.

§ 42-1415. Enforcement of filing fees.

After filing of the director’s report in a general adjudication, the director may prohibit in accordance with chapter 3, title 42, Idaho Code, the diversion and use of water in satisfaction of a right claimed or decreed in the adjudication upon the failure of the claimant to comply with the schedule for payment of variable fees as set forth in subsection (1) of section 42-1414, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1416, 42-1416A. Presumptions in basin-wide adjudication — Prior change in point of diversion. [Repealed.]

§ 42-1416B. Claim for expanded use in critical ground water area — Determination of water availability.

Within any critical ground water area designated pursuant to section 42-233a, Idaho Code, a claim to the expanded use of a ground water right, which use was expanded in violation of the mandatory permit requirements, may be decreed in a general water rights adjudication if the expansion occurred after the designation of the critical ground water area, before the commencement of the adjudication, and before the date of enactment of this section. The priority date for the right decreed shall be June 30, 1985.

Water shall be deemed unavailable to fill the rights for expanded use, even if decreed in the adjudication, unless the director finds that a management program exists which will, within a time period acceptable to the director, limit the average annual water withdrawals from the aquifer designated in the critical ground water area to no more than the average annual recharge to the aquifer.

Within two (2) years after a decree determining the water rights within a critical ground water area becomes final, but not sooner than four (4) years from the date of enactment of this section, the director of the department of water resources shall make a finding as to whether an adequate management program exists to bring withdrawals into balance with recharge.

If the director finds that an adequate management program to bring withdrawals into balance with recharge does not exist, the director shall order all holders of rights to expanded use of ground water within the area to cease or reduce withdrawal of water until such time as the director determines that withdrawals have been brought into balance with recharge and sufficient ground water is available to resume or increase withdrawals. The director’s order shall be issued before September 1 and shall be effective beginning with the following growing season.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Expanded use” means an increase in the number of acres irrigated, or other additional use, under a valid ground water right without any increase in the rate of diversion or volume of water diverted.

“Management program” means a program to recharge the aquifer, limit withdrawals from the aquifer or provide surface water supplies for all, or a portion, of the land irrigated with water withdrawn from the aquifer, including any actions designed to bring withdrawals into balance with the average annual recharge to the aquifer.

“Recharge” refers to all processes, natural or artificial, which add water to the aquifer.

“Withdrawal” refers to all processes, natural or artificial, which take water from the aquifer.

The hearing and judicial review provisions of section 42-1701A, Idaho Code, shall apply to any findings and orders issued by the director pursuant to this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the director of the department of water resources to administer and enforce any other ground water laws of the state.

§ 42-1417. General adjudication — Interim administration of water rights.

The district court may permit the distribution of water pursuant to chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code:

in accordance with the director’s report or as modified by the court’s order;

in accordance with applicable partial decree(s) for water rights acquired under state law;

in accordance with applicable partial decree(s) for water rights established under federal law.

The district court may enter the order only:

upon a motion by a party;

after notice by the moving party by mail to the director and each claimant of water from the water system or portion thereof that could reasonably be determined to be adversely affected by entry of the order; and

upon a determination by the court, after hearing, that the interim administration of water rights in accordance with the report, or as the report is modified by the court’s order, and in accordance with any partial decree(s), is reasonably necessary to protect senior water rights.

Immediately upon entry of the court’s order of interim administration of water rights, the clerk of the district court shall mail a certified copy of the order to the director, and the director shall immediately give notice of the order to the watermaster of the water districts affected by the order.

After entry of the district court’s order for interim administration, the director may form a water district pursuant to chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code.

§ 42-1418. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from an order, partial decree, or decree of the district court in any adjudication proceeding as provided by rule or order of the supreme court.

§ 42-1419. Entry of an order commencing a general adjudication on a special docket — Constructive notice — Filing of certified copy of order in other counties.

The clerk of the district court shall enter an order commencing a general adjudication on a special docket for water right adjudications in addition to any other district court record.

From the time of docketing and not before, any order commencing a general adjudication is constructive notice of the contents thereof, within the county in which the order is docketed, to subsequent purchasers and mortgagees.

The director shall file a true and certified copy of any order commencing a general adjudication with the district court for each county of this state where the water system to be adjudicated is located. The clerk of the district court shall file and docket the same as provided in subsection (1) of this section. From the time of such docketing and not before, the order so docketed is constructive notice of the contents thereof within the county in which the order is docketed to subsequent purchasers and mortgagees.

§ 42-1420. Binding effect of decree — Exceptions.

The decree entered in a general adjudication shall be conclusive as to the nature and extent of all water rights in the adjudicated water system except that the following described water rights shall not be lost by failure to file a notice of claim:

a water right for domestic use or stock watering use, specifically excluded from the general adjudication by court order;

a water right application for permit filed under chapters [chapter] 2 or 15, title 42, Idaho Code;

a water right permit issued under chapters [chapter] 2 or 15, title 42, Idaho Code, unless the director required the permit holder to file a notice of claim in accordance with subsection (7) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code;

a water right license issued under chapter 2 or 15, title 42, Idaho Code, if proof of beneficial use had not been filed on the date of commencement of the general adjudication, unless the director required the license holder to file a notice of claim in accordance with subsection (7) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code; and

a claim to a water right established under federal law, if the priority of the right claimed is later than and junior to the date of entry of the order commencing the general adjudication.

The exceptions from the conclusive effect of a decree in a general adjudication stated in subsection (1) above shall not apply to any water right for which a notice of claim or negotiated agreement is filed.

§ 42-1421. Procedures for adjudication of unperfected water rights initiated under state law — Director’s jurisdiction.

All persons claiming a water right based on an application or permit on the date of entry of the order commencing a general adjudication are not required to file a notice of claim unless required in accordance with subsection (7) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code. If the director approves the application in whole or in part during the pendency of a general adjudication and prior to filing the director’s report, the director shall notify the permit holder of the pendency of the general adjudication. A permit holder who is not required by the director to file a notice of claim in accordance with subsection (7) of section 42-1409, Idaho Code, may file a notice of claim at any time prior to filing the director’s report.

All persons claiming a water right based on a water right license existing on the date of entry of the order commencing a general adjudication shall file a notice of claim.

The district court shall decree any claimed water right for which proof of beneficial use has not been filed, but shall state that the right is conditioned upon completion of the appropriation in accordance with the laws of the state governing the appropriation of water and that the decreed right shall be subject to the terms of the license to appropriate water that is ultimately issued.

The director retains jurisdiction of all applications, permits and licenses under chapter 2, 3, 6 or 15, title 42, Idaho Code, to take action authorized by the conditions contained in any permit or license or by applicable law and action on any application for transfer under section 42-222, Idaho Code.

The director retains jurisdiction of all decreed water rights under chapters 2, 3 and 6, title 42, Idaho Code, to take action authorized by the conditions of any decree or by applicable law, including action on any application for transfer under section 42-222, Idaho Code.

The director retains jurisdiction of all beneficial use water rights under chapters 2, 3 and 6, title 42, Idaho Code, to take action authorized by applicable law.

§ 42-1422. Special master — Appointment — Powers and duties — Compensation — Disqualification — Review of special master’s report.

The district court may appoint one (1) or more special masters in any general adjudication.

The district court shall specify the powers and duties of a special master in the order of reference. The compensation and disqualification of a special master shall be governed by order or rule of the supreme court.

Objections to and hearing on the special master’s report shall be governed by rule 53(e) of the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

§ 42-1423. Attorneys fees and costs against the state of Idaho, any state agency or any officer or employee.

No judgment for costs or award of attorneys fees against the state of Idaho, any state agency, or any officer or employee of the state of Idaho shall be allowed in any water rights adjudication proceeding pursuant to this chapter. The state of Idaho expressly refuses to waive its sovereign immunity to the imposition of any judgment for costs or award of attorney fees. The state of Idaho, state administrative agency, or any officer or employee shall not be required to pay any fees other than those provided in section 42-1414, Idaho Code, for appearing in a proceeding brought under this chapter or any appeal of a matter arising from such proceeding.